Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Registration of Firearms
[Repealed]

§§ 45-9-1 through 45-9-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 341, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§45-9-1. [Codes, 1942, § 8621; Laws, 1942, ch. 177; Laws, 1946, ch. 272, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 444, § 46]

§§45-9-3 through45-9-17. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8622-8625, 8627-8630; Laws, 1942, ch. 177; Laws, 1946, ch. 272, §§ 3-6, 8-11]

§ 45-9-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, ch. 407, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1988).

[Codes, 1942, § 8631.5; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 23, § 1]